en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Fish & Aquatic Supplies > Aquatic Plant Fertilizers: Granular Fertilizers; Liquid Fertilizers; Powder Fertilizers; Tablet Fertilizers
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Hal- és vízi kellékek > Vízinövény-műtrágyák: Granulált műtrágyák; Folyékony műtrágyák; Por műtrágyák; Tablettaműtrágyák
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Kala- ja akvaariotarvikkeet > Akvaariokasvien ravinteet: Lannoiterakeet; Lannoitenesteet; Lannoitejauheet; Lannoitetabletit
zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 魚和水族用品 > 水生植物專用肥料: 顆粒肥料; 液態肥料; 粉狀肥料; 錠狀肥料
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Artigos aquáticos e para peixes > Fertilizadores de plantas aquáticas: Fertilizantes granulados; Fertilizantes líquidos; Fertilizantes em pó; Fertilizantes em pastilhas
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Zierfisch- Aquarien- und Teichbedarf > Wasserpflanzendünger: Granulatdünger; Flüssigdünger; Pulverdünger; Tablettendünger
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์ทางน้ำและปลา > ปุ๋ยสำหรับพืชน้ำ: ปุ๋ยเม็ดละเอียด; ปุ๋ยน้ำ; ปุ๋ยผง; ปุ๋ยเม็ดยา
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Suministros para peces y acuarios > Fertilizantes para plantas acuáticas: Fertilizantes granulares; Fertilizantes líquidos; Fertilizantes en polvo; Fertilizantes en tabletas
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru pești și acvaristică > Îngrășăminte pentru plante acvatice: Îngrășăminte granulare; Îngrășăminte lichide; Îngrășăminte sub formă de pudră; Îngrășăminte sub formă de tablete
el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για ψάρια & υδρόβια ζώα > Λιπάσματα υδρόβιων φυτών: Κοκκώδη λιπάσματα; Υγρά λιπάσματα; Λιπάσματα σε σκόνη; Λιπάσματα σε δισκία
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Potřeby pro ryby a vodní živočichy > Hnojiva pro vodní rostliny: Granulovaná hnojiva; Tekutá hnojiva; Prášková hnojiva; Tabletová hnojiva
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Forniture ittiche e acquatiche > Fertilizzanti per piante acquatiche: Fertilizzanti granulari; Fertilizzanti liquidi; Fertilizzanti in polvere; Fertilizzanti in compresse
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho cá & động vật thủy sinh > Phân bón cho cây thủy sinh: Phân bón dạng hạt; Phân bón dạng lỏng; Phân bón dạng bột; Phân bón dạng viên
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Fisk og vandforsyninger > Gødning til akvarieplanter: Granulær gødning; Flydende gødning; Pulvergødning; Tabletgødning
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 鱼类和水族用品 > 水生植物肥料: 颗粒肥料; 液体肥料; 粉状肥料; 片剂肥料
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Poissons et fournitures aquatiques > Engrais pour plantes aquatiques: Engrais granulaires; Engrais liquides; Engrais en poudre; Engrais en comprimés
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za ribe in vodne živali > Gnojila za vodne rastline: Gnojila v zrncih; Tekoča gnojila; Gnojila v prahu; Gnojila v obliki tablet
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Balık ve Su Malzemeleri > Su Bitkisi Gübreleri: Granül Gübreler; Sıvı Gübreler; Toz Gübreler; Tablet Gübreler
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Fisk och vattentillbehör > Gödningsmedel för akvarieväxter: Granulära gödselmedel; Flytande gödselmedel; Pulvergödselmedel; Tablettgödselmedel
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Товары для рыб и аквариумов > Удобрения для водорослей: Гранулированные удобрения; Жидкие удобрения; Порошковые удобрения; Удобрения в таблетках
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Риби и артикули за акваристика > Торове за аквариумни растения: Гранулирани торове; Течни торове; Прахообразни торове; Торове на таблетки
nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Fiske- og vannutstyr > Gjødsel for vannplanter: Granulær gjødsel; Flytende gjødsel; Pulvergjødsel; Tablettgjødsel
lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės žuvims ir kitiems vandens gyvūnams > Vandens augalų trąšos: Granuliuotos trąšos; Skystos trąšos; Miltelinės trąšos; Trąšų tabletės
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za ribe i vodeni svijet > Gnojiva za vodene biljke: Granulirana gnojiva; Tekuća gnojiva; Gnojiva u prahu; Gnojiva u obliku tableta
ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > 魚・水産用品 > 水草肥料: 粒状肥料; 液体肥料; 粉肥料; 錠剤肥料
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Peixes e suprimentos aquáticos > Fertilizantes para plantas aquáticas: Fertilizantes granulados; Fertilizantes líquidos; Fertilizantes em pó; Fertilizantes em tabletes
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 어류/수족관 용품 > 수중 식물 비료: 과립형 비료; 액상 비료; 분말 비료; 알약 비료
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły i akcesoria dla rybek > Nawozy do roślin akwariowych: Nawozy granulowane; Nawozy płynne; Nawozy w proszku; Nawozy w tabletkach
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Benodigdheden voor vissen en water > Kunstmest voor waterplanten: Korrrelkunstmest; Vloeibare kunstmest; Poederkunstmest; Tabletkunstmest
sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre rybička a akváriá > Hnojivá pre vodné rastliny: Granulované hnojivá; Tekuté hnojivá; Práškové hnojivá; Tabletové hnojivá